Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-51] Application for a permit.
All permit applications filed under this part shall contain the following:

(1) The name and address of the applicant and
landowner; provided that:

(A) In the event the applicant is an
association, organization, partnership, trust, corporation, or any other legal
entity doing business in Hawaii, the address of its principal place of business
shall be stated in the application; and

(B) In the event a lessee, licensee,
developer, or any other person with a terminable interest or estate in the
land, which is the water source of the permitted water, applies for a water
permit, the landowner shall also be stated as a joint applicant for the water
permit;

(2) The date of application;

(3) The water source of the water supply;

(4) The quantity of water requested;

(5) The use of the water and any limitations thereon;

(6) The location of the use of water;

(7) The location of the well or point of diversion;
and

(8) Such other relevant information that the
commission may request from time to time.

The commission in its discretion may allow a person
to apply for several related withdrawals in the same application for a water
permit. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next